Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-201
Charter required; exception; powers of Department of Banking and Finance; rules and regulations; fee.

The Director of Banking and Finance shall have the power to issue to corporations desiring to transact business as trust companies charters of authority to transact trust company business as defined in the Nebraska Trust Company Act. He or she shall have general supervision and control over such trust companies. Any three or more persons may adopt articles of incorporation and become a body corporate for the purpose of engaging in and conducting the business of a trust company, upon complying with the requirements of the act and the general laws of this state relating to the organization of corporations and upon obtaining a charter to transact business as a trust company from the director.

Every corporation organized for and desiring to transact a trust company business shall, before commencing such business, make under oath and transmit to the Department of Banking and Finance a complete statement including:

(1) The name of the proposed trust company;

(2) A certified copy of the articles of incorporation;

(3) The names of the stockholders;

(4) The name of the county, city, or village in which the trust company is located;

(5) The amount of paid-up capital stock; and

(6) A statement sworn to by the president and secretary that the capital stock has been paid in as provided for.

The corporation shall also pay the fee prescribed by section 8-602 for investigation of such statement.

If upon investigation the department is satisfied that the parties requesting the charter are parties of integrity and responsibility, that the corporation will apply safe and sound methods for the purpose of carrying out trust company duties, and that the public necessity, convenience, and advantage will be promoted by permitting the corporation to transact business as a trust company, the department shall issue to the corporation a charter entitling it to transact the business provided for in the act. Upon payment of the required fees, the pledging of assets required by section 8-209, and the receipt of the charter, the corporation may begin to transact business as a trust company. It shall be unlawful for any corporation, except a foreign corporate trustee to the extent authorized under section 30-3820, to engage in business as a trust company or to act in any other fiduciary capacity unless it has first obtained from the Department of Banking and Finance a charter of authority to do business.

The Department of Banking and Finance may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the governance of trust companies under its supervision.

Laws 1911, c. 31, § 1, p. 187;

R.S.1913, § 738;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVIII, § 1, p. 718;

C.S.1922, § 8063;

Laws 1927, c. 35, § 1, p. 159;

C.S.1929, § 8-201;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 73, p. 171;

Laws 1937, c. 20, § 3, p. 130;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-201;

R.S.1943, § 8-201;

Laws 1957, c. 10, § 2, p. 129;

Laws 1975, LB 481, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 14;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 33;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 111.

Corporations organized under this article were empowered to accept and execute trusts and to discharge the duties imposed thereby. First Trust Company v. Airedale Ranch & Cattle Company, 136 Neb. 521, 286 N.W. 766 (1939).

The officers of a trust company are responsible for the fraudulent acts of the corporation in which they participate. Wells v. Carlsen, 130 Neb. 773, 266 N.W. 618 (1936).

Contract of trust company for handling and payment of life insurance premiums did not create trust relationship. Crancer v. Reichenbach, 130 Neb. 645, 266 N.W. 57 (1936).

Individuals who are permitted to create trust companies to handle other people's money must use the same fidelity that one uses in his own business to see that the trust company does not defraud the public. Masonic Bldg. Corporation v. Carlsen, 128 Neb. 108, 258 N.W. 44 (1934).

Trust company organized under state law is not "banking corporation" within meaning of state law or of bankruptcy law, and is subject to bankruptcy. Gamble v. Daniel, 39 F.2d 447 (8th Cir. 1930), appeal dismissed 281 U.S. 705 (1930).